src/morphology/affixes/adjectives-oahpa.lexc
LEXICON ÅBPOE_N_OE_PL !!= ** __@CODE@__
 +Nom:oe%>h       FINAL1 ;
 +Acc:o%>jde      FINAL1 ;
 +Gen:oe%>j       FINAL1 ;
 +Ill:o%>jde      FINAL1 ;
 +Ine:o%>jne      FINAL1 ;
 +Ela:o%>jste     FINAL1 ;
 +Com:oe%>jgujmie FINAL1 ;

LEXICON ÅBPOE_N_OE_ESS !!= ** __@CODE@__
 +Ess:o%>jne FINAL1 ;

LEXICON ABPA !!= * __@CODE@__
  +Sg:      ABPA_SG ; ! Causes Umlaut
  +Pl:      ABPA_PL ;
 +Ess:%>ine FINAL1  ;


LEXICON ABPA_SG !!= ** __@CODE@__
 +Nom:a      FINAL1 ;
 +Acc:a%>m   FINAL1 ;
 +Gen:a%>n   FINAL1 ;
 +Ill:e%>se  FINAL1 ;
 +Ine:e%>sne FINAL1 ;
 +Ela:e%>ste FINAL1 ;
 +Com:%>ine  FINAL1 ;

LEXICON ABPA_PL !!= ** __@CODE@__
 +Nom:a%>h       FINAL1 ;
 +Acc:%>ide      FINAL1 ;
 +Gen:a%>j       FINAL1 ;
 +Ill:%>ide      FINAL1 ;
 +Ine:%>ine      FINAL1 ;
 +Ela:%>ijste    FINAL1 ;
 +Com:a%>jgujmie FINAL1 ;

LEXICON MES !!= * __@CODE@__
     +A+Superl+Attr:%>%^COMPDISIMPmes%^DISIMP       ATTRCONT ;
   +A+Superl+Sg+Nom:%>%^COMPDISIMPmes%^DISIMP       FINAL1   ;
   +A+Superl+Sg+Acc:masse%>m                        FINAL1   ;
   +A+Superl+Sg+Gen:masse%>n                        FINAL1   ;
   +A+Superl+Sg+Ill:masse%>se                       FINAL1   ;
   +A+Superl+Sg+Ine:masse%>sne                      FINAL1   ;
   +A+Superl+Sg+Ela:masse%>ste                      FINAL1   ;
   +A+Superl+Sg+Com:mass%>ine                       FINAL1   ;
   +A+Superl+Pl+Nom:%>%^COMPDISIMP%>mass%>%^DISIMPh FINAL1   ;
   +A+Superl+Pl+Acc:%>mass%>ide                     FINAL1   ;
   +A+Superl+Pl+Gen:%>%^COMPDISIMP%>mass%>%^DISIMP  IGENSUFF ;
   +A+Superl+Pl+Ill:%>mass%>ide                     FINAL1   ;
   +A+Superl+Pl+Ine:%>mass%>ine                     FINAL1   ;
   +A+Superl+Pl+Ela:%>mass%>ijste                   FINAL1   ;
   +A+Superl+Pl+Com:%>mass%>igujmie                 FINAL1   ;
          +A+Superl:mass                            EVEN_ESS ;
 +A+Superl+SgNomCmp:%>%^COMPDISIMPmes%^DISIMP       R        ;
 +A+Superl+SgGenCmp:masse%>n                        R        ;
 +A+Superl+PlGenCmp:mass%>i                         R        ;
          +A+Superl:%>%^COMPDISIMPmes%^DISIMP       LAAKAN   ;

LEXICON MES_oe !!= * __@CODE@__
   +A+Superl+Sg+Nom:%>%^COMPDISIMPmes%^DISIMP        FINAL1   ;
   +A+Superl+Sg+Nom:%>%^COMPDISIMP2mes%^DISIMP       FINAL1   ;
   +A+Superl+Sg+Acc:masse%>m                         FINAL1   ;
   +A+Superl+Sg+Gen:masse%>n                         FINAL1   ;
   +A+Superl+Sg+Ill:masse%>se                        FINAL1   ;
   +A+Superl+Sg+Ine:masse%>sne                       FINAL1   ;
   +A+Superl+Sg+Ela:masse%>ste                       FINAL1   ;
   +A+Superl+Sg+Com:mass%>ine                        FINAL1   ;
   +A+Superl+Pl+Nom:%>%^COMPDISIMP%>mass%>%^DISIMPh  FINAL1   ;
   +A+Superl+Pl+Nom:%>%^COMPDISIMP2%>mass%>%^DISIMPh FINAL1   ;
   +A+Superl+Pl+Acc:%>mass%>ide                      FINAL1   ;
   +A+Superl+Pl+Gen:%>%^COMPDISIMP%>mass%>%^DISIMP   IGENSUFF ;
   +A+Superl+Pl+Gen:%>%^COMPDISIMP2%>mass%>%^DISIMP  IGENSUFF ;
   +A+Superl+Pl+Ill:%>mass%>ide                      FINAL1   ;
   +A+Superl+Pl+Ine:%>mass%>ine                      FINAL1   ;
   +A+Superl+Pl+Ela:%>mass%>ijste                    FINAL1   ;
   +A+Superl+Pl+Com:%>mass%>igujmie                  FINAL1   ;
          +A+Superl:mass                             EVEN_ESS ;
 +A+Superl+SgNomCmp:%>%^COMPDISIMPmes%^DISIMP        R        ;
 +A+Superl+SgNomCmp:%>%^COMPDISIMP2mes%^DISIMP       R        ;
 +A+Superl+SgGenCmp:masse%>n                         R        ;
 +A+Superl+PlGenCmp:mass%>i                          R        ;

LEXICON OMMES !!= * __@CODE@__
   +A+Superl+Sg+Nom:%^DISIMP     FINAL1    ;
   +A+Superl+Sg+Acc:e%>%^DISIMPm FINAL1    ;
   +A+Superl+Sg+Gen:e%>%^DISIMPn FINAL1    ;
   +A+Superl+Sg+Ill:%>asse       FINAL1    ; !Rule to delete Jesuse%>asse > Jesusasse
   +A+Superl+Sg+Ine:%>isnie      FINAL1    ;
   +A+Superl+Sg+Ela:%>istie      FINAL1    ;
   +A+Superl+Sg+Com:%>inie       FINAL1    ;
       +A+Superl+Pl:             N_ODD_PL  ;
          +A+Superl:             N_ODD_ESS ;
 +A+Superl+SgNomCmp:             R         ;
 +A+Superl+SgGenCmp:e%>n         R         ;
 +A+Superl+PlGenCmp:%>%^DISIMPi  R         ;


LEXICON LAAKAN !!= * __@CODE@__
         +Der1+Der/laakan:laakan  adv ;
 +Der1+Der/laakan+Err/Orth:-laakan adv ;

LEXICON LEEJNES !!= * __@CODE@__
         :#leejnes ATTR_0 ;
  +Use/NG:#leejns  ATTR_0 ;
 +Err/Orth:-leejnes ATTR_0 ;
 +Err/Orth:-leejns  ATTR_0 ;
