src/morphology/stems/adjectives-oahpa.lexc
LEXICON Adjective  !!= !!@CODE@
aktetjeleejnes:aktetje LEEJNES ;
gaskemes:gaske MES ; !superl
geekteleejnes:geekte LEEJNES ;
guektieleejnes:guektie LEEJNES ;
jeatjahleejnes:jeatjah LEEJNES ;
måadtieleejnes:måadtie LEEJNES ;
måedtieleejnes:måedtie LEEJNES ;
nåavedeleejnes:nåavede LEEJNES ;
seammaleejnes:seamma LEEJNES ;
minngemes+Use/MT:minnge MES ;
